North Carolina, session 2025, SB559.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Legislative Research Commission (LRC) shall study the need for
bereavement leave for State employees. The LRC shall consider relevant data from the Office of
State Human Resources as part of its assessment. The LRC shall report its findings and any
legislative proposals to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the General Assembly
the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to fund the study
mandated by this act.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S559-v-1*